Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 5

Municipal Inspection Fees

57-3-501. Municipal inspection fee — Maximum amount — Collection of fees.

A municipality as defined by § 57-3-101 shall have the authority to impose by ordinance an inspection fee upon licensed retailers of alcoholic beverages as defined by § 57-3-101 or upon retail food store wine licensees located within such municipality.

If, pursuant to § 57-3-204(d)(7), a manufacturer of high alcohol content beer obtains a retail license to sell its products which are manufactured on the manufacturer's premise, the governing body of the municipality or county in which such a manufacturer is located shall impose by ordinance or resolution, as appropriate, a fifteen-percent inspection fee to inspect the retail store in which such products are sold by the manufacturer. Such inspection fee shall be imposed on the wholesale price of the high alcohol content beer supplied pursuant to § 57-3-204(d)(7)(B) by a wholesaler for those products manufactured and sold by the manufacturer at its retail store as authorized pursuant to § 57-3-204(d)(7).

The inspection fees shall not exceed eight percent (8%) of the wholesale price of alcoholic beverages supplied by a wholesaler in municipalities located in counties of this state having a population of less than sixty thousand (60,000), according to the 1960 federal census or any subsequent federal census, or in counties that contain a municipal corporation as defined in § 67-6-103(a)(3)(B)(i), notwithstanding subsection (c) to the contrary.

The inspection fees shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the wholesale price of alcoholic beverages supplied by a wholesaler in municipalities located in counties of this state having a population of more than sixty thousand (60,000), according to the 1960 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Any municipality having a metropolitan form of government and a population of over four hundred fifty thousand (450,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, which has levied the inspection fees herein authorized may, by ordinance of its legislative body, designate the county clerk as the collector of the fees for the entire metropolitan taxing jurisdiction.

Acts 1968, ch. 538, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 87, § 1; T.C.A., § 57-165; Acts 1994, ch. 758, § 1; 1999, ch. 218, § 1; 2011, ch. 448, § 17; 2014, ch. 554, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Damaged or unaccepted goods, tax liability, §57-3-109.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 5, 10.

57-3-502. Collection by wholesaler from retailer.

The inspection fee shall be collected by the wholesaler from the retailer following notice given the wholesaler by the municipality that an inspection fee has been imposed by ordinance upon the retailers located within the particular municipality. The inspection fee shall be collected by the wholesaler at the time of the sale or at the time the retailer makes payment for the delivery of the alcoholic beverages.

Acts 1968, ch. 538, § 3; T.C.A., § 57-166.

57-3-503. Monthly report and payment — Reimbursement of wholesalers — Penalty — Audits.

Each wholesaler making sales to retailers located within a municipality imposing an inspection fee shall furnish the municipality a report monthly, which report shall contain a list of the alcoholic beverages sold to each retailer located within the municipality, the wholesale price of the alcoholic beverages sold to each retailer, the amount of tax due, and such other information as may be required by the municipality. The monthly report shall be furnished the municipality imposing the tax not later than the twentieth of the month following which the sales were made. The inspection fees collected by the wholesaler from the retailer or retailers located within each municipality shall be paid to the municipality at the time the monthly report is made. Wholesalers collecting and remitting the above inspection fee to municipalities shall be entitled to reimbursement for this collection service, a sum equal to five percent (5%) of the total amount of inspection fees collected and remitted, such reimbursement to be deducted and shown on the monthly report to the municipality.

Failure to collect or timely report and/or pay the inspection fee collected shall result in a penalty of ten percent (10%) of the fee due the municipality which shall be payable to the municipality imposing the inspection fee.

Municipalities to whom inspection fees are paid shall have authority to audit the records of wholesalers reporting to them in order to determine the accuracy of such reports.

Acts 1968, ch. 538, §§ 4, 5, 7; T.C.A., § 57-167.

57-3-504. Fee to be exclusive — Metropolitan governments.

The inspection fee provided for herein shall be in lieu of all other gross receipt or inspection fees imposed upon wholesalers or retailers of alcoholic beverages by municipalities and no other additional or similar fees shall be imposed by ordinance.

No municipality shall impose any inspection fee or similar tax upon wholesalers based upon sales made to retail dealers located in other municipalities, it being the legislative intent that a municipality shall have authority to impose the inspection fee provided for herein only upon retailers located within the particular municipality imposing the inspection fee.

Notwithstanding anything herein provided to the contrary, the principal municipality, in a county which has adopted the metropolitan form of government under title 7, chapters 1-3, or which may hereafter adopt such form of government, may impose an inspection fee or similar fee, under the authority of chapter 3, part 5 of this title, upon wholesalers based on sales made to licensed retailers located in other but smaller municipalities within the same county as the principal municipality;

“Principal municipality,” for the purpose of this subsection (c), means the largest municipality, or its successor, within such a county in accordance with the 1960 federal census or subsequent federal census;

When such principal municipality imposes such a fee upon wholesalers, they shall collect same from the sales to retailers within the smaller municipalities and remit such collections to the principal municipality unless and until such smaller municipalities adopt by ordinance or resolution, such fees in accordance with the terms of chapter 3, part 5 of this title, and then the wholesalers will remit such collections to the smaller municipalities in accordance with the provisions of such ordinances or resolutions as may be adopted or passed by them.

Acts 1968, ch. 538, § 6; T.C.A., § 57-168.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, § 10.